Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 1

General Provisions

6-56-101. Biennial audit required.

It is the duty of the governing board of every municipal corporation to have a thorough audit of the financial affairs of the corporation, including all receipts from every source and every expenditure or disbursement of the money of the corporation, made by a disinterested person skilled in such work, as often as every two (2) years.

Each audit shall cover the period extending back to the date of the last preceding audit.

The cost of each audit shall be paid out of the funds of the municipality, and a sufficient sum shall be appropriated by the board for that purpose.

Acts 1917, ch. 64, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1947a1; mod. Code 1932, § 3501; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-801.

Cross-References. Audit of subordinate agencies, § 6-56-105.

Powers of department of audit and its local finance division, §§ 4-3-304, 4-3-305.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., 19 Municipal Corporations, § 88.

6-56-102. Responsibility of municipal officers for audit.

The duties placed upon the board in § 6-56-101 shall devolve upon the officers of every municipal corporation having power to provide and enact ordinances for the corporation.

Acts 1917, ch. 64, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 1947a2; mod. Code 1932, § 3502; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-802.

6-56-103. Taxpayers compelling audit.

If two (2) years lapse without the audit provided for in §§ 6-56-101 and 6-56-102 being made, any ten (10) persons over eighteen (18) years of age, who have paid taxes to such municipal corporation during the two-year period for which no audit has been made, may file a written demand for such an audit with the mayor, and if the audit is not commenced within fifteen (15) days after the filing of such demand, the ten (10) persons may file their bill in the chancery court against the corporation, and officers of the corporation charged with the duty of causing the audit to be made. Upon proof of their failure to provide for the audit and the demand therefor by the complainants, the chancellor shall decree that the audit be made, and shall appoint an auditor who shall make the audit. The cost of the audit so made shall be adjudged against the municipality as a part of the costs of the case.

Acts 1917, ch. 64, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1947a3; Code 1932, § 3503; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 162, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-803.

6-56-104. Audit as public record — Publication.

The result of each audit provided for in §§ 6-56-101 — 6-56-103 shall be kept as a public record of the corporation, and shall be always subject to the inspection of each citizen or taxpayer of the corporation.

A summary of the audit, prepared by the auditor, shall be published in at least one (1) issue of a newspaper of general circulation in the corporation, if there is one.

The municipality shall place a copy of the result of each audit in the main branch of the public library located within the boundaries of the municipality. A municipality that permits access to public information through the Internet may also place a copy on the municipality's homepage.

Acts 1917, ch. 64, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 1947a4; Code 1932, § 3504; Acts 1970, ch. 426, § 15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-804; Acts 1997, ch. 446, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Working papers of a municipality's audit committee and internal auditor are public records and subject to inspection under the Public Records Act, OAG 06-060, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 61 (4/5/06).

6-56-105. Audit of subordinate agencies.

The governing body of each municipality shall cause an annual audit to be made of the accounts and records of all departments, boards, and agencies under its jurisdiction that receive and disburse funds. The audit shall include, but not be limited to, general funds, highway funds, school funds, public utilities and municipal courts.

The comptroller of the treasury, through the department of audit, shall be responsible for ensuring that the audits are prepared in accordance with generally accepted governmental auditing standards and determining whether the audits meet minimum audit standards, which shall be prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury. No audit may be accepted as meeting the requirements of this section until such audit has been approved by the comptroller of the treasury.

The audits may be prepared by certified public accountants, public accountants or by the department of audit. In the event the governing body of the municipality fails or refuses to have the audit prepared, the comptroller of the treasury may appoint a certified public accountant or public accountant or direct the department of audit to prepare the audit, the cost of such audit to be paid by the municipality.

All such audits shall be completed as soon as practicable after the end of the fiscal year of the municipality. One (1) copy of each audit shall be furnished to the mayor, chief executive officer, each member of the governing body, and the comptroller of the treasury. Copies of each audit shall also be made available to the press.

All audits performed by the internal audit staff of the municipality shall be conducted in accordance with the standards established by the comptroller of the treasury pursuant to § 4-3-304(9).

Acts 1972, ch. 602, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-811; Acts 1984, ch. 794, § 3; 2004, ch. 914, § 6d.

Attorney General Opinions. A metropolitan government has a responsibility to annually audit the accounts and financial records of the metropolitan airport authority, OAG 01-167, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 179 (11/20/01).

Working papers of a municipality's audit committee and internal auditor are public records and subject to inspection under the Public Records Act, OAG 06-060, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 61 (4/5/06).

6-56-106. Authorized investments.

In order to provide a safe temporary medium for investment of idle funds, municipalities are authorized to invest in the following:

Bonds, notes or treasury bills of the United States;

Nonconvertible debt securities of the following federal government sponsored enterprises that are chartered by the United States congress; provided, that such securities are rated in the highest category by at least two (2) nationally recognized rating services:

The federal home loan bank;

The federal national mortgage association;

The federal farm credit bank; and

The federal home loan mortgage corporation;

Any other obligations not listed in subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) that are guaranteed as to principal and interest by the United States or any of its agencies;

Certificates of deposit and other evidences of deposit at state and federally chartered banks, and savings and loan associations. Notwithstanding any other public or private act to the contrary, all investments made pursuant to this subdivision (a)(4) shall be secured by collateral in the same manner and under the same conditions as state deposits under title 9, chapter 4, parts 1 and 4, or as provided in a collateral pool created under title 9, chapter 4, part 5;

Obligations of the United States or its agencies under a repurchase agreement for a shorter time than the maturity date of the security itself if the market value of the security itself is more than the amount of funds invested; provided, that municipalities may invest in repurchase agreements only if the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee approves repurchase agreements as an authorized investment, and if such investments are made in accordance with procedures established by the state funding board;

The local government investment pool created by title 9, chapter 4, part 7;

Municipalities having a population in excess of one hundred fifty thousand (150,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, may also permit investment of idle funds in the following investment instruments:

Prime banker's acceptances that are eligible for purchase by the federal reserve system; and

Prime commercial paper that is rated at least A1 or equivalent by at least two (2) nationally recognized rating services;

Municipalities having a population of not less than twenty thousand (20,000) nor more than one hundred fifty thousand (150,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, may also permit investment of idle funds in prime commercial paper in accordance with the following:

Such paper shall be rated in the highest category by at least two (2) commercial paper rating services; and

The paper shall have a remaining maturity of ninety (90) days or less;

Investment in the instruments set forth in this subdivision (a)(7) shall first be authorized by the municipality's legislative body, acting by resolution or ordinance. In addition, investment in such instruments shall be prohibited until the legislative body has adopted written policies to govern the use of such instruments, with such policies being no less restrictive than those established by the state funding board to govern state investments in such instruments;

The municipality's own bonds or notes issued in accordance with title 9, chapter 21; and

Investment in the instruments set forth in subdivision (a)(2), (a)(5), (a)(7), or any type of investment authorized pursuant to a municipality's charter that is of a type that is not included in this part shall require the following:

The municipality's legislative body must authorize the investment by ordinance; and

The legislative body must adopt a written enforceable investment policy by ordinance to govern the use of investments, with the policies being no less restrictive than those established by the state funding board to govern state investments in these types of instruments.

Investment in instruments covered by this subdivision (a)(9) shall be prohibited until the legislative body has adopted written policies to govern the use of the investments or an ordinance has been passed to authorize the investment.

The investments listed in subdivisions (a)(1)-(4) may have a maturity of not greater than four (4) years from the date of investment; however, such investments may have a maturity of greater than four (4) years from the date of investment if such maturity is approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee.

Proceeds of bonds, notes and other obligations issued by municipalities, reserves held in connection therewith and the investment income therefrom, may be invested in obligations that:

Are rated in either of the two (2) highest rated categories by a nationally recognized rating agency of such obligation;

Are direct general obligations of a state of the United States, or a political subdivision or instrumentality thereof, having general taxing powers; and

Have a final maturity on the date of investment of not to exceed forty-eight (48) months or that may be tendered by the holder to the issuer thereof, or an agent of the issuer, at not less than forty-eight-month intervals.

Such proceeds and the investment income thereon may also be invested as otherwise set forth in this section.

The investments authorized by this section are in addition to those authorized in any other general law or in any municipality's charter.

Acts 1943, ch. 47, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.29 (Williams, § 3516.31); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-805; Acts 1985, ch. 299, § 1; 1988, ch. 632, § 1; 1990, ch. 814, § 1; 1991, ch. 165, § 1; 1992, ch. 592, § 7; 1993, ch. 448, § 3; 1994, ch. 752, § 7; 1994, ch. 794, § 1; 1994, ch. 806, § 2; 2000, ch. 996, §§ 4-6; 2004, ch. 466, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 693, §§ 5-7; 2010, ch. 868, §§ 14, 15.

Compiler's Notes. For table of populations of Tennessee municipalities see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Investing in obligations of public housing authority authorized, §§ 13-20-613, 35-3-115.

Investments in TVA bonds, § 35-3-119.

Collateral References.

Power of boards or officials to depart from literal requirements in respect of deposits or loans of public funds in their control. 104 A.L.R. 623.

6-56-107. Selection of bonds for investment.

For the purpose of carrying out § 6-56-106, the governing body of the municipality may appoint a committee with authority to act in the premises and, unless the governing body shall designate the specific series of bonds in which such funds shall be invested, the selection of the series for investment of such funds as will be best suited to the requirements of the municipality shall be made by the committee.

No liability shall attach to any member of a committee selected for the aforementioned purpose, except for misfeasance or malfeasance in the performance of the duties imposed on the committee.

Acts 1943, ch. 47, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.30 (Williams, § 3516.32); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-806.

6-56-108. Contributions to watershed development authority.

Any municipality of this state may make financial contributions to any watershed development authority created by special act of the general assembly, where a portion or all of the watershed development administered by such authority lies within the county wherein such municipality is situated, and such municipality is participating directly or indirectly in such development. Such contributions shall only be made when authorized by the legislative body of such municipality from the general funds of such municipality. No special tax may be levied for such contributions. The amount of such contribution shall be fixed by such legislative body and sanctioned thereby as a municipal purpose, the development of which being beneficial to such municipality.

Acts 1965, ch. 343, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-807.

6-56-109. Acceptance of partial payments of property taxes — Acceptance of taxes paid by electronic funds.

Any municipality that collects its own property taxes may by ordinance opt to accept partial payments of property taxes.

Prior to any municipality accepting partial payment of property taxes, the municipality must file a plan with the comptroller of the treasury. The plan must indicate that the municipality has the accounting system technology to implement a program for partial payment of property taxes. The plan shall also indicate whether such a program will be implemented within the existing operating resources of the municipal department collecting the tax or indicate prior approval of the municipal legislative body if additional operating resources are needed. This subsection (b) does not apply to any municipality which has implemented a partial payment program prior to March 29, 2010.

A municipality may accept taxes paid by electronic funds transfer, including, but not limited to, bank customer preauthorized payments, wire transfers or automated clearing house (ACH) credits. If the entire amount of taxes due is not paid prior to the delinquency date for such taxes, the entire property shall be subject to the tax lien and enforcement by a tax sale or other legally authorized procedures. Unless partial payment is made by electronic transfer of funds, if the municipality accepts partial payment within ten (10) days of the delinquency date, or at any time following such delinquency date, then prior to accepting such payment the municipality must inform the taxpayer of the delinquency date and must advise such taxpayer that the property may be subjected to a tax lien and enforcement by tax sale or other legally authorized procedures.

Direct bank transfers and partial payments are subject to the following guidelines:

Vouchers issued pursuant to a relief program shall be used as all or a portion of the final payment; and

A receipt shall be issued to the taxpayer for any partial payment of taxes. The receipt shall state that:

The payment is a partial payment of property taxes;

The balance owing on such taxes that must be paid prior to the delinquency date; and

A failure to pay the entire amount of the taxes prior to the delinquency date subjects any unpaid taxes to the penalties and interest applicable to delinquent taxes and subjects the entire property on which there is a lien for taxes to a tax sale. The final partial payment shall show that a zero (0) balance is owing or shall state that the taxes are paid in full. Receipts shall also be sent to the taxpayer for payments made by direct bank transfer of funds.

The powers conferred by this section are in addition to any existing powers conferred by statute, municipal charter or other law.

Acts 2010, ch. 660, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 6-56-109 (Acts 1971, ch. 345, § 2; T.C.A., § 6-809), concerning the salary of municipal judges in certain municipalities, was transferred to § 6-56-151 by the code commission in 2005.

6-56-110. Depositories of municipal funds.

The contracting authority for a municipality shall contract with a bank or banks making the best proposal to become the depository of municipal funds.

Before entering into a contract under subdivision (a)(1), the contracting authority for a municipality or the contracting authority's designee shall review and analyze the proposals from the banks. The analysis of the proposals should consider the bank or banks proposing the highest interest rate, potential service charges or other fees, factors affecting safety and liquidity of municipal funds, and any other relevant factors.

The contracting authority for the municipality shall require any bank that becomes a depository of municipal funds to secure the funds by collateral in the same manner and under the same conditions as state deposits under title 9, chapter 4, parts 1 and 4, or as provided in a collateral pool created under title 9, chapter 4, part 5.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, at least once every four (4) years, the contracting authority for the municipality or their designee shall reevaluate the contracts entered into pursuant to subsection (a). The contracting authority for the municipality or their designee shall base the evaluation on proposals obtained from at least two (2) banks. The contracting authority for a municipality or their designee shall prepare a written evaluation of the proposals and preserve the evaluations for at least three (3) years.

This section applies to any municipality that does not have banking evaluation provisions in its charter that are at least as detailed as those provided in this section.

Acts 1992, ch. 592, § 8; 1994, ch. 752, § 8; 1997, ch. 217, § 1; 2019, ch. 277, § 4.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote this section, which read: “Notwithstanding any other public or private act to the contrary, any municipal funds deposited with a financial institution shall be secured by collateral in the same manner and under the same conditions as state deposits under title 9, chapter 4, parts 1 and 4, or as provided in the collateral pool created under title 9, chapter 4, part 5.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 277, § 5. July 1, 2019.

6-56-111. Deposit of funds — Petty cash — Disbursement — Penalty for violations.

Every municipal official handling public funds shall be required to, as soon as practical, but no later than three (3) working days after the receipt by such municipal official of any public funds, deposit the funds to the credit of such municipality's official bank account, or bank accounts.

This requirement shall not prohibit a municipal official handling public funds from maintaining a petty cash fund in an amount sufficient for the transaction of the official business of the municipal official's office.

Every municipal official authorized to disburse public funds shall be required to make disbursements of such public funds by consecutively prenumbered checks, warrants or other generally accepted negotiable instruments drawn on the municipality's official bank account or accounts. Disbursements may also be made by electronic transfer, if such transfer is properly documented and recorded.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1993, ch. 448, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

6-56-112. Lawful municipal purpose required.

All expenditures of money made by a municipality must be made for a lawful municipal purpose.

Acts 1993, ch. 448, § 2.

Attorney General Opinions. Lawful municipal purposes, OAG 94-90, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 97 (8/26/94).

City development of residential real estate, OAG 98-042, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 42 (2/17/98).

Authority of city utility system to repair privately owned lines, OAG 06-030, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 30 (2/13/06).

6-56-113 — 6-56-150. [Reserved.]

The minimum salary payable to municipal judges that have been created in all municipalities having a population greater than one hundred seventy thousand (170,000), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, shall be fourteen thousand five hundred dollars ($14,500) per annum, payable in equal monthly installments. Any municipality affected by this section may provide for greater compensation for the office of municipal judge. Any salary for the office of municipal judge shall be paid by the municipality wherein the office of municipal judge is established.

Acts 1971, ch. 345, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 6-809; T.C.A. § 6-56-109.

Compiler's Notes. For table of populations of Tennessee municipalities see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. City court, title 6, ch. 21, part 5.